Hawaii statutes.
§37-113.1 Council on revenues; estimate of
total personal income. The council shall prepare an estimate of the total
state personal income for the calendar year in progress and, when necessary,
for the next succeeding calendar year for which such income has not been
determined or published and shall report the estimate and any revision thereto
to the director of finance, the governor, the chief justice, and the
legislature each August 5 and November 5. [L 1987, c 136, §1; am L 1988, c 124,
§1; am L 2000, c 33, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next